Missouri, session 2026, HB1655.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 104.200, 104.490, 104.1060, and 104.1092, RSMo, are repealed
and five new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 104.200, 104.490,
104.1060, 104.1092, and 105.695, to read as follows:
104.200. Should any error in any records result in any member or beneficiary
receiving more or less than he or she would have been entitled to receive had the records been
correct, the board shall correct such error, and, as far as practicable, to recover any
overpayments, may accept single sum or installment repayments or make future
payments in such a manner that the actuarial equivalent of the benefit to which such member
or beneficiary was entitled shall be paid[, and to this end may recover any overpayments]. In
all cases in which such error has been made, no such error shall be corrected unless the
system discovers or is notified of such error within ten years after the member's annuity
starting date or the date of error, whichever occurs later. In cases of fraud, any error
discovered shall be corrected without concern for the amount of time that has passed.
104.490. 1. Should any error result in any member or beneficiary receiving more or
less than he or she would have been entitled to receive had the error not occurred, the board
shall correct such error, and, as far as practicable, to recover any overpayments, may accept
single sum or installment repayments or make future payments in such a manner that the
actuarial equivalent of the benefit to which such member or beneficiary was entitled shall be
paid[, and to this end may recover any overpayments]. In all cases in which such error has
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 1655 2
been made, no such error shall be corrected unless the system discovers or is notified of such
error within ten years after the member's annuity starting date or the date of error, whichever
occurs later. In cases of fraud, any error discovered shall be corrected without concern to the
amount of time that has passed.
2. A person who knowingly makes a false statement, or falsifies or permits to be
falsified a record of the system, in an attempt to defraud the system is subject to fine or
imprisonment pursuant to the Missouri revised statutes.
3. The board of trustees of the Missouri state employees' retirement system shall
cease paying benefits to any survivor or beneficiary who is charged with the intentional
killing of a member without legal excuse or justification. A survivor or beneficiary who is
convicted of such charge shall no longer be entitled to receive benefits. If the survivor or
beneficiary is not convicted of such charge, the board shall resume payment of benefits and
shall pay the survivor or beneficiary any benefits that were suspended pending resolution of
such charge.
104.1060. 1. Should any error result in any person receiving more or less than the
person would have been entitled to receive had the error not occurred, the board shall correct
such error, and, as far as practicable, to recover any overpayments, may accept single sum
or installment repayments or make future payments in such a manner that the actuarial
equivalent of the annuity to which such person was entitled shall be paid[, and to this end may
recover any overpayments]. In all cases in which such error has been made, no such error
shall be corrected unless the system discovers or is notified of such error within ten years after
the member's annuity starting date or the date of error, whichever occurs later. In cases of
fraud, any error discovered shall be corrected without concern to the amount of time that has
passed.
2. A person who knowingly makes a false statement, or falsifies or permits to be
falsified a record of the system, in an attempt to defraud the system shall be subject to fine or
imprisonment under the Missouri revised statutes.
3. A board shall not pay an annuity to any survivor or beneficiary who is charged with
the intentional killing of a member, retiree or survivor without legal excuse or justification. A
survivor or beneficiary who is convicted of such charge shall no longer be entitled to receive
an annuity. If the survivor or beneficiary is not convicted of such charge, the board shall
resume annuity payments and shall pay the survivor or beneficiary any annuity payments that
were suspended pending resolution of such charge.
104.1092. 1. In lieu of retirement annuity benefits otherwise payable under the
closed plan or year 2000 plan, any member who has terminated employment, is entitled to a
deferred annuity, and has not yet reached normal retirement age or eligibility may make a
one-time election to receive a lump sum payment equal to a percentage of the present value of

HB 1655 3
such member's deferred annuity should a board choose to establish such a program by board
rule pursuant to section 104.1063.
2. Any such election under subsection 1 of this section may be made by the member
beginning on [a date as established by the board under such program but not] or after [May
31, 2018. After May 31, 2018, no such election shall be made and retirement annuity benefits
shall only be paid as otherwise provided by law under this chapter] January 1, 2027.
3. Any such member making such election under subsection 1 of this section shall
forfeit all such member's creditable or credited service and future rights to receive retirement
annuity benefits from the system under this chapter and shall not be eligible to receive any
long-term disability benefits. If such member subsequently becomes an employee, such
member shall be considered a new employee with no prior credited service and shall be
subject to the provisions of section 104.1091.
105.695. 1. No contribution or expenditure of system funds shall be made
directly by any public pension system to advocate, support, or oppose the passage or
defeat of any ballot measure or the nomination or election of any candidate for public
office. Nor shall any system funds pay any debts or obligations of any committee
supporting or opposing such ballot measures or candidates.
2. For the purposes of this section, the term "system" shall be defined as any
retirement system established by the state of Missouri or any political subdivision or
instrumentality of the state for the purpose of providing plan benefits for elected or
appointed public officials or employees of the state of Missouri or any political
subdivision or instrumentality of the state.
✔